Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB259.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Carbon Monoxide Alarm Standards in Schools Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved carbon monoxide alarm." The term includes:(1) A single or multiple station carbon monoxide alarm listed as complying with the approved American National Standard for Safety for Single and Multiple Station Carbon Monoxide Alarms (ANSI/UL2034) or a carbon monoxide detector listed as complying with the approved American National 1234567891011121314151617 Standard for Safety for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075) installed in accordance with this act.(2) A device that may be combined with a smoke alarm or smoke detector if the combined smoke alarm or detector meets all of the following:(i) Complies with either of the following:(A) The approved American National Standard for Safety for Single and Multiple Station Carbon Monoxide Alarms (ANSI/UL2034) for carbon monoxide alarms and the approved American National Standard for Safety for Single and Multiple Station Smoke Alarms (ANSI/UL217) for smoke alarms.(B) The approved American National Standard for Safety for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075) for carbon monoxide detectors and the approved American National Standard for Safety for Smoke Detectors for Fire Alarm Systems (ANSI/UL268) for smoke detectors.(ii) Emits an alarm in a manner that clearly differentiates between detecting the presence of carbon monoxide and the presence of smoke.(3) A carbon monoxide detection system that includes carbon monoxide detectors and audible notification appliances that are installed and maintained in accordance with the National Fire Alarm and Signaling Code (NFPA 72) and the Standard for the Installation of Carbon Monoxide (CO) Detection and Warning Equipment (NFPA 720) and are in compliance with the approved American National Standard for Safety for Gas and Vapor Detectors and Sensors (ANSI/UL2075)."Classroom." A room located in a public school or a 20250SB0259PN0213 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonpublic school where one or more students receive instruction."Fossil fuel." Coal, kerosene, oil, wood, fuel gases and other petroleum or hydrocarbon products which emit carbon monoxide as a by-product of combustion."Installed." A carbon monoxide alarm that meets one of the following criteria in accordance with the Standard for the Installation of Carbon Monoxide (CO) Detection and Warning Equipment (NFPA 720):(1) is hardwired into the electrical wiring;(2) is directly plugged into an electrical outlet without a switch, other than a circuit breaker; or(3) if the alarm is powered by battery, is attached to the wall or ceiling of a school or classroom."Nonpublic school." A school, other than a public school, in which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory attendance requirements of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, and which meets the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241)."Operational." Working and in service."Public school." Any of the following:(1) A school of a school district.(2) A charter school.(3) A regional charter school.(4) A cyber charter school that provides educational instruction by any means at one or more centrally located facilities where students attend the instruction."School." A public school or nonpublic school.Section 3. Administration.Nothing in this act is intended to modify the authority and 20250SB0259PN0213 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 responsibilities of the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act.Section 4. Carbon monoxide alarm requirements.(a) Installation.--A school that uses a fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance or has an attached garage must have an operational, centrally located and approved carbon monoxide alarm installed in the vicinity of every classroom that is located on the same story as the fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance or attached garage within 18 months of the effective date of this section.(b) Maintenance, repair or replacement.--The governing body of a school is responsible for providing for the maintenance, repair or replacement of an approved carbon monoxide alarm or the care and replacement of batteries.Section 5. Enforcement.Willful failure to install or maintain an operational approved carbon monoxide alarm required by this act is a summary offense punishable by a fine of up to $50.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0259PN0213 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021